Missouri, session 2026, SB965.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 210, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 210.1015, to read as
follows:
210.1015. 1. There is hereby created a statewide
program called the "Christian Taylor Ferguson ("CTF")
Medical Alert System" referred to in this section as the
"system", to aid in the identification and location of a
missing endangered person.
2. For the purposes of this section, the term
"endangered person" shall mean an individual, including a
child, who is missing under unexplained, involuntary, or
suspicious circumstances and who is believed to be in danger
because of a medical condition that requires immediate care,
medication, or treatment.
3. The department of public safety shall develop
regions to provide the system. The department shall
coordinate with local law enforcement agencies and public
commercial television and radio broadcasters to provide an
effective system. In the event that a local law enforcement
agency opts not to set up a system and a report of a missing

SB 965 2
endangered person occurs within the jurisdiction, the agency
shall notify the department who shall notify local media in
the region.
4. The system shall include all state agencies capable
of providing urgent and timely information to the public
together with broadcasters and other private entities that
volunteer to participate in the dissemination of urgent
public information. At a minimum, the system shall include
the department of public safety, the state highway patrol,
the department of transportation, the department of health
and senior services, and the Missouri lottery.
5. Participation in the system is entirely at the
option of local law enforcement agencies and federally
licensed radio and television broadcasters.
6. Any person who knowingly makes a false report that
triggers an alert pursuant to this section is guilty of a
class A misdemeanor.
7. The department of public safety shall administer
and promulgate rules for implementation of the system. Any
rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓